Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-165
Conservation and Survey Division; agreements with federal departments.

The Conservation and Survey Division may enter into such agreements with federal departments as may be necessary to carry on cooperative surveys and investigations in the state, the agreements to be subject to the approval of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.

Laws 1921, c. 16, § 3, p. 103;

C.S.1922, § 6775;

C.S.1929, § 85-165.